Utah statutes.
70A-5-110.   Warranties.
(1)  If its presentation is honored, the beneficiary warrants:
(a)  to the issuer, any other person to whom presentation is made, and the
applicant that there is no fraud or forgery of the kind described in
Subsection 70A-5-109(1); and
(b)  to the applicant that the drawing does not violate any agreement between
the applicant and beneficiary or any other agreement intended by them to be
augmented by the letter of credit.
(2)  The warranties in Subsection (1) are in addition to warranties arising
under Title 70A, Chapter 3, Uniform Commercial Code - Negotiable Instruments,
Chapter 4, Uniform Commercial Code - Bank Deposits and Collections, Chapter
7a, Uniform Commercial Code - Documents of Title, and Chapter 8, Uniform
Commercial Code - Investment Securities, because of the presentation or
transfer of documents covered by any of those chapters.
